Mississippi, session 2026, HB164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The school board of each school district shall require each teacher employed by the district to develop and incorporate daily and weekly homework assignments into the curriculum.  The daily homework assignments must include both written and reading assignments.  As part of the weekly assignments, students must be required to complete vocabulary and spelling homework lessons. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.